hr-HR: Spremnost mješavine palminog voska: 100 % palmin vosak; Palmina mješavina za posude; Palmina mješavina za svijeće u stupcu; Mješavina palmina i pčelinjeg voska; Mješavina palmina voska i parafina; Mješavina palmina i sojina voska; Ostalo
it: Prontezza della miscela di cera di palma: 100% cera di palma; Miscela di palma per contenitori; Miscela di palma per candele a colonna; Misto cera di palma e cera d'api; Misto cera di palma e paraffina; Misto cera di palma e soia; Altro
sl-SI: Pripravljenost mešanice palmovega voska: 100 % palmov vosek; Mešanica palmovega voska za posode; Mešanica palmovega voska za sveče; Mešanica palmovega in čebeljega voska; Mešanica palmovega voska in parafina; Mešanica palmovega in sojinega voska; Drugo
de: Mischungsart des Palmwachses: 100 % Palmwachs; Palmwachs-Container-Mischung; Palmwachs-Stumpen-Mischung; Palm-Bienenwachs-Mischung; Palm-Paraffin-Mischung; Palm-Soja-Mischung; Sonstige
sv: Blandningsgrad för palmvax: 100 % palmvax; Palmvax för behållare; Palmvax för blockljus; Blandning av palm- och bivax; Blandning av palmvax och paraffin; Blandning av palm- och sojavax; Övrigt
el: Ετοιμότητα μείγματος κεριού φοινικέλαιου: 100% κερί φοίνικα; Μείγμα κεριού φοίνικα για δοχεία; Μείγμα κεριού φοίνικα για κηροπήγια; Μείγμα κεριού φοίνικα και μέλισσας; Μείγμα κεριού φοίνικα και παραφίνης; Μείγμα κεριού φοίνικα και σόγιας; Άλλο
fi: Palmuvahasekoituksen valmius: 100 % palmivaha; Palmuvahaseos (astioille); Palmuvahaseos (pöytäkynttilöille); Palmu-mehiläisvahaseos; Palmu-parafiinivahaseos; Palmu-soijavahaseos; Muu
tr: Palmiye mumu karışım durumu: %100 palmiye mumu; Kap içi palmiye mumu karışımı; Sütun palmiye mumu karışımı; Palmiye mumu - balmumu karışımı; Palmiye mumu - parafin karışımı; Palmiye mumu - soya mumu karışımı; Diğer
th: ความพร้อมของส่วนผสมขี้ผึ้งปาล์ม: ไขปาล์ม 100%; ไขปาล์มผสมสำหรับเทียนในภาชนะ; ไขปาล์มผสมสำหรับเทียนแท่ง; ไขปาล์มผสมขี้ผึ้ง; ไขปาล์มผสมพาราฟิน; ไขปาล์มผสมไขถั่วเหลือง; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Готовност на сместа от палмов восък: 100% палмов восък; Палмова смес за съдове; Палмова смес за свободностоящи свещи; Смес от палмов и пчелен восък; Смес от палмов восък и парафин; Смес от палмов и соев восък; Друго
pt-PT: Preparação da mistura de cera de palma: Cera de palma a 100%; Mistura de palma para recipientes; Mistura de palma para pilares; Mistura de palma e cera de abelha; Mistura de palma e parafina; Mistura de palma e soja; Outro
ja: パームワックスブレンドの準備完了: パームワックス100%; パームコンテナブレンド; パームピラーブレンド; パーム・蜜蝋ブレンド; パーム・パラフィンブレンド; パーム・ソイブレンド; その他
sk-SK: Pripravenosť zmesi palmového vosku: 100 % palmový vosk; Zmes palmového vosku do nádob; Zmes palmového vosku na stĺpové sviečky; Zmes palmového a včelieho vosku; Zmes palmového vosku a parafínu; Zmes palmového a sójového vosku; Iné
ro-RO: Gradul de pregătire al amestecului de ceară de palmier: Ceară de palmier 100%; Amestec de palmier pentru recipient; Amestec de palmier pentru lumânări tip stâlp; Amestec de ceară de palmier și albine; Amestec de palmier și parafină; Amestec de palmier și soia; Altele
ru: Степень готовности смеси пальмового воска: 100% пальмовый воск; Пальмовая контейнерная смесь; Пальмовая формовая смесь; Смесь пальмового и пчелиного воска; Смесь пальмового воска и парафина; Смесь пальмового и соевого воска; Другое
hu: Pálmaviasz keveréktípusa: 100% pálmaviasz; Pálmaviasz tartályos keverék; Pálmaviasz tömb keverék; Pálma-méhviasz keverék; Pálma-paraffin keverék; Pálma-szója keverék; Egyéb
nb: Palmevoksblandingens bruksklarhet: 100 % palmevoks; Palmevoks for beholdere; Palmevoks for blokklys; Palme-/bivoksblanding; Palme-/parafinblanding; Palme-/soyablanding; Annet
es: Disponibilidad de mezcla de cera de palma: 100 % cera de palma; Mezcla de cera de palma para recipientes; Mezcla de cera de palma para velas de pilar; Mezcla de cera de palma y cera de abejas; Mezcla de cera de palma y parafina; Mezcla de cera de palma y soja; Otro
en: Palm wax blend readiness: 100% palm wax; Palm container blend; Palm pillar blend; Palm-beeswax blend; Palm-paraffin blend; Palm-soy blend; Other
zh-CN: 棕榈蜡调配就绪度: 100% 棕榈蜡; 棕榈容器蜡混合; 棕榈柱蜡混合; 棕榈蜂蜡混合; 棕榈石蜡混合; 棕榈大豆蜡混合; 其他
pt-BR: Prontidão da mistura de cera de palma: 100% cera de palma; Mistura de palma para recipientes; Mistura de palma para pilar; Mistura de cera de palma e abelha; Mistura de cera de palma e parafina; Mistura de cera de palma e soja; Outro
ko: 팜 왁스 블렌드 준비 상태: 팜 왁스 100%; 팜 컨테이너 블렌드; 팜 필라 블렌드; 팜 밀랍 블렌드; 팜 파라핀 블렌드; 팜 소이 블렌드; 기타
zh-TW: 棕櫚蠟預混狀態: 100% 棕櫚蠟; 棕櫚容器混合蠟; 棕櫚柱狀混合蠟; 棕櫚蠟與蜂蠟混合; 棕櫚蠟與石蠟混合; 棕櫚蠟與大豆蠟混合; 其他
lt-LT: Palmių vaško mišinio paruoštumo tipas: 100 % palmių vaškas; Palmių vaško mišinys indeliams; Palmių vaško mišinys pastatomoms žvakėms; Palmių ir bičių vaško mišinys; Palmių vaško ir parafino mišinys; Palmių ir sojų vaško mišinys; Kita
da: Klarhed med palmevoksblanding: 100 % palmevoks; Palmevoksblanding til beholdere; Palmevoksblanding til bloklys; Palme- og bivoksblanding; Palmevoks- og paraffinblanding; Palme- og sojavoksblanding; Anden
pl: Gotowość mieszanki wosku palmowego: 100% wosk palmowy; Mieszanka palmowa do pojemników; Mieszanka palmowa do świec słupkowych; Mieszanka wosku palmowego i pszczelego; Mieszanka wosku palmowego i parafiny; Mieszanka wosku palmowego i sojowego; Inne
fr: État du mélange de cire de palme: 100 % cire de palme; Mélange de palme pour contenant; Mélange de palme pour pilier; Mélange palme et cire d’abeille; Mélange palme et paraffine; Mélange palme et soja; Autre
nl: Palmwas mengselgereedheid: 100% palmwas; Palmwas container-blend; Palmwas stompkaars-blend; Palm-bijenwasmix; Palm-paraffinemix; Palm-sojamix; Overig
cs: Připravenost směsi palmového vosku: 100% palmový vosk; Palmová směs pro nádoby; Palmová směs pro válcové svíčky; Směs palmového a včelího vosku; Směs palmového vosku a parafínu; Směs palmového a sójového vosku; Jiné
vi: Sự sẵn sàng của hỗn hợp sáp cọ: 100% sáp cọ; Hỗn hợp sáp cọ đổ hũ; Hỗn hợp sáp cọ đổ trụ; Hỗn hợp sáp cọ và sáp ong; Hỗn hợp sáp cọ và parafin; Hỗn hợp sáp cọ và sáp đậu nành; Khác